apertium-ga-gd/apertium-ga-gd.ga-full.dix
    <pardef n="teit/h__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>headh</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>headh</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>headh</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>heann</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>heann</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>heann</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>heann</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hfear</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hfidh</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hfidh</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hfidh</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hfidh</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hfidh</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hfimid</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hidís</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>higí</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>himid</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>him</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>himis</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>h</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>him</l>
          <r>h<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Éir/e__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eann</l>
          <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inn</l>
          <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dálaí__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gréithe__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="éig/iall__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>éille</l>
          <r>iall<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iall</l>
          <r>iall<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sé__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="seacht"><i>seacht</i><par n="sé__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ocht"><i>ocht</i><par n="sé__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="teith"><i>teit</i><par n="teit/h__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sé"><i>sé</i><par n="sé__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="éigiall"><par n="initial-é"/><i>ig</i><par n="éig/iall__n"/></e>
    <e lm="doldrama"><par n="initial-d"/><i>oldrama</i><par n="gréithe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beilteanna"><par n="initial-b"/><i>eilteanna</i><par n="dálaí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="díchiall"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ích</i><par n="éig/iall__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cnaguirlisí"><par n="initial-c"/><i>naguirlisí</i><par n="dálaí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brangóidí"><par n="initial-b"/><i>rangóidí</i><par n="dálaí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cuingeacha"><par n="initial-c"/><i>uingeacha</i><par n="dálaí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cumaí"><par n="initial-c"/><i>umaí</i><par n="dálaí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="billéardaí"><par n="initial-b"/><i>illéardaí</i><par n="gréithe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cuarta"><par n="initial-c"/><i>uarta</i><par n="dálaí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cnúthacha"><par n="initial-c"/><i>núthacha</i><par n="gréithe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bliana"><par n="initial-b"/><i>liana</i><par n="dálaí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ciapóga"><par n="initial-c"/><i>iapóga</i><par n="dálaí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="daitheacha"><par n="initial-d"/><i>aitheacha</i><par n="dálaí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dálaí"><par n="initial-d"/><i>álaí</i><par n="dálaí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="airdeoga"><par n="initial-a"/><i>irdeoga</i><par n="dálaí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dumhcha"><par n="initial-d"/><i>umhcha</i><par n="dálaí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pinginí"><par n="initial-p"/><i>inginí</i><par n="dálaí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="searáidí"><par n="initial-s"/><i>earáidí</i><par n="dálaí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gréithe"><par n="initial-g"/><i>réithe</i><par n="gréithe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="luathbhlianta"><i>luathbhlianta</i><par n="dálaí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="litreacha"><i>litreacha</i><par n="dálaí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="peorcaisí"><par n="initial-p"/><i>eorcaisí</i><par n="dálaí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pitseámaí"><par n="initial-p"/><i>itseámaí</i><par n="gréithe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="míchiall"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ích</i><par n="éig/iall__n"/></e>
    <e lm="miontuairiscí"><par n="initial-m"/><i>iontuairiscí</i><par n="dálaí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uaire"><par n="initial-u"/><i>aire</i><par n="dálaí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sreanga"><par n="initial-s"/><i>reanga</i><par n="dálaí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sólaistí"><par n="initial-s"/><i>ólaistí</i><par n="dálaí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="téada"><par n="initial-t"/><i>éada</i><par n="dálaí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tuarascálacha"><par n="initial-t"/><i>uarascálacha</i><par n="dálaí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Blascaodaí"><i>Blascaodaí</i><par n="gréithe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Éire"><i>Éire</i><par n="Éir/e__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Piréiní"><i>Piréiní</i><par n="gréithe__n"/></e>
